Rhode Island, session 2025, SB334.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-7.2 of the General Laws entitled "The Education Equity and
Property Tax Relief Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-7.2-11. School districts may elect and choose not to spend money on mandates not
fully funded.
(a)(1) On and after July 1, 2026, a school district may elect and choose not to spend money
on any mandate that is not fully funded through the provisions of this chapter or of any other state
funding received through the department of elementary and secondary education (the
“department”).
(2) As used herein, the term “mandate” means any rule, regulation, or other policy
implemented by the department that requires an action to be taken or not taken, and which requires
a school district to expend funds as a result of that rule, regulation, or other policy, and no funds
are provided from or through the state including, but not limited to, the foundation education-aid
formula, to support that action.
(b) A school district electing and choosing not to spend money pursuant to this section shall
certify to the department in a written notice the specific mandate that is not being funded, and the
total dollar amount being saved by the school district as a result of not spending money on this
mandate. This written notice shall be filed on or before August 31 of the fiscal year for which the
school district shall not be spending the money. This written notice shall be required to be provided

in any year in which the school district proposes to act pursuant to this section.
(c) A school district electing and choosing not to spend money pursuant to this section shall
not be penalized or have their state aid reduced as a result of this action.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000873
========
LC000873 - Page 2 of 3